Illinois, session 104th, HB928.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Racial Impact Note Act is amended by 5changing Section 110-1 as follows: 6    (25 ILCS 83/110-1)7    Sec. 110-1. Short title. This Article may be cited as the 8the Racial Impact Note Act.9(Source: P.A. 102-4, eff. 4-27-21.)